lexicon/nouns.lexc
!
! nouns.lexc - Noun Declension Lexicon
! Contains noun patterns by declension class
!

!
! ============================================================
! MASCULINE NOUN PATTERNS
! ============================================================

! qatal/qetol pattern - regular masculine
LEXICON QATAL-M

%<sg%>%<abs%>:qatal    NFIN ;
%<sg%>%<cstr%>:qetal   NFIN ;
%<pl%>%<abs%>:qatil    NFIN ;
%<pl%>%<cstr%>:qatile  NFIN ;

! qatul pattern
LEXICON QATUL-M

%<sg%>%<abs%>:qatul    NFIN ;
%<sg%>%<cstr%>:qtul    NFIN ;
%<pl%>%<abs%>:qtalim   NFIN ;
%<pl%>%<cstr%>:qtale  NFIN ;


!
! ============================================================
! FEMININE NOUN PATTERNS
! ============================================================

! Feminine in -āh (-ת suffix)
LEXICON FEM-AH

%<sg%>%<abs%>:ah      NFIN ;
%<sg%>%<cstr%>:at     NFIN ;
%<pl%>%<abs%>:ot     NFIN ;
%<pl%>%<cstr%>:ot     NFIN ;

! Feminine in -t
LEXICON FEM-T

%<sg%>%<abs%>:t       NFIN ;
%<sg%>%<cstr%>:t      NFIN ;
%<pl%>%<abs%>:ot     NFIN ;
%<pl%>%<cstr%>:ot     NFIN ;


!
! ============================================================
! SEGHOLATE NOUNS (C_eC pattern)
! ============================================================

LEXICON SEGHOLATE

%<sg%>%<abs%>:CeC     NFIN ;
%<sg%>%<cstr%>:CeC    NFIN ;
%<pl%>%<abs%>:CeCim   NFIN ;
%<pl%>%<cstr%>:CeCe   NFIN ;


!
! ============================================================
! IRREGULAR NOUNS
! ============================================================

! אב father
אָב:3b      [I=AB]   QATAL-M ;

! אח brother  
אָח:3h      [I=AH]   QATAL-M ;

! בן son
בֵּן:bn      [I=BEN]  QATAL-M ;

! בית house
בַּיִת:byt      [I=BET]  QATAL-M ;

! אָדָם man
אָדָם:3dm     [I=ADAM] QATAL-M ;

! אֱלֹהִים God (plural only)
אֱלֹהִים:3lohim  [I=ELOAHIM] PLURAL ;

! שָׁמַיִם heavens (plural only)
שָׁמַיִם:šmayim [I=ŠAMAYIM] PLURAL ;


!
! ============================================================
! NOUN COMPLEMENTS
! ============================================================

LEXICON NFIN

! Null ending for absolute
# ;

LEXICON PLURAL

%<pl%>%<abs%>:im     # ;
%<pl%>%<cstr%>:e     # ;


!
! ============================================================
! CONSTRUCT CHAIN (noun + noun compounds)
! ============================================================

LEXICON CONSTRUCT

! Construct state - noun is in genitive relationship
%<cstr%>:e        # ;


!
! ============================================================
! PRONOMINAL SUFFIX ATTACHMENT
! ============================================================

LEXICON N-POSS

! Possessive suffixes attach here
# ;


!
! ============================================================
! GENTILIC PATTERNS
! ============================================================

LEXICON GENTILE

! Gentilic suffix -ī (י的一面)
%<sg%>%<abs%>:i       NFIN ;
%<sg%>%<cstr%>:i      NFIN ;
%<pl%>%<abs%>:im     NFIN ;
%<pl%>%<cstr%>:e     NFIN ;


!
! ============================================================
! PROPER NOUNS
! ============================================================

LEXICON PROPER

! Proper nouns follow regular patterns
# ;


!
! ============================================================
! DUAL NOUNS (rare in BH)
! ============================================================

LEXICON DUAL

! Dual endings -āyim (אַיִם)
%<du%>%<abs%>:ayim    # ;
%<du%>%<cstr%>:e      # ;


!
! ============================================================
! ABSTRACT NOUNS (maqtal pattern)
! ============================================================

LEXICON MAQTAL

%<sg%>%<abs%>:maqtal  NFIN ;
%<sg%>%<cstr%>:maqtel NFIN ;


!
! ============================================================
! INFINITIVE CONSTRUCTS AS NOUNS
! ============================================================

LEXICON INF-NOUN

! Infinitive construct can function as noun
# ;


!
! ============================================================
! PARTITIVE NOUNS
! ============================================================

LEXICON PARTITIVE

%<sg%>%<abs%>:CeCa     NFIN ;
%<sg%>%<cstr%>:CeC     NFIN ;
%<pl%>%<abs%>:CeCim    NFIN ;
%<pl%>%<cstr%>:CeCe   NFIN ;
